Tennessee, session 114, SB2216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 102, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Participation in the state's employee assistance program, including
components for mental health and wellness, is available for all active members of a
volunteer fire department and all active volunteer members of a combination fire
department recognized under the Fire Department Recognition Act, compiled in part 3 of
this chapter. This state shall pay all costs associated with such access.
(b) For purposes of this section, "employee assistance program" means a
program that provides counseling, problem identification, intervention, assessment, or
referral for appropriate diagnosis and treatment, and follow-up services to assist
employees who are impaired by personal concerns, including, but not limited to, health,
marital, family, financial, alcohol, drug, legal, emotional, stress, or other personal
concerns that may adversely affect employee job performance.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-102-304(2), is amended by
deleting the language "as determined by the Tennessee Fire Incident Reporting System
(TFIRS)".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-102-304(4), is amended by
deleting the language "by certified mail".
SB2216
011316
- 1 -

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-102-304, is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision (2) and redesignating the existing subdivisions accordingly:
(2) A fire department shall submit with an application, in a format prescribed by
the state fire marshal's office, a list of active members of the department that includes,
but is not limited to, name, mailing address, rank, public safety identification number
(PSID), and birth date. The state fire marshal's office may require a more frequent
periodic update of the department's membership list through electronic means of those
departments participating in state grant programs, training or training incentive
programs, or other state-related opportunities.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-50-119(b)(3), is amended by
deleting "full-time" and substituting "full-time or part-time".
SECTION 6. Section 1 and Section 5 take effect January 1, 2027, the public welfare
requiring it. The remaining sections take effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare
requiring it.
- 2 - 011316